Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-706
Unconstitutional.

The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705, has omitted sections 85-701 to 85-721, which the Supreme Court has held to be unconstitutional. State ex rel. Rogers v. Swanson, 192 Neb. 125, 219 N.W.2d 726 (1974).